Utah statutes.
9-7-304.   Book register -- Time limit.
(1)  The state law librarian shall keep a register of all books issued and
returned, showing to whom issued, by whom returned, and the time issued and
returned.
(2)  No book taken from the law library may be detained more than 10 days,
except by permission of the state law librarian.
